Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1596.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204(58) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended and the section is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(58) The sale at retail or use of a personal computer, a tablet, a personal digital assistant, a peripheral device or an Internet access device, or a service contract or single-user 12345678910111213141516171819202122 licensed software purchased in conjunction with a personal computer, tablet, personal digital assistant, peripheral device or Internet access device, with a sales price of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), during the exclusion period by an individual purchaser for nonbusiness use. The exclusion does not include a sale at retail or use of, leasing, rental or repair of a personal computer, tablet, personal digital assistant, peripheral device or Internet access device; mainframe computers; network servers; local area network hubs; routers and network cabling; network operating systems; multiple-user licensed software; minicomputers; [hand-held computers; personal digital assistants without Internet access;] hardware word processors; graphical calculators; video game consoles; telephones; digital cameras; pagers; compact discs encoded with music or movies; and digital versatile discs encoded with music or movies. For purposes of this clause, the phrase "exclusion period" means the period of time from [August 5, 2001, to and including August 12, 2001, and from February 17, 2002, to and including February 24, 2002.] the first Saturday in August to and including the third Saturday in August. For purposes of this clause, "purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of school supplies during the exclusion period for nonbusiness purposes. For the purposes of this clause:(i) The following terms or phrases shall have the following meanings:20250HB1596PN1908 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Art supplies" shall mean clay and glazes, paints, paintbrushes, sketch and drawing pads and watercolors."Exclusion period" shall mean the first Saturday in August to and including the third Saturday in August."Instructional materials" shall mean reference books, reference maps and globes, textbooks and workbooks."School supplies" shall mean items such as book bags, pens, pencils, pencil sharpeners, markers, highlighters, erasers, crayons, blackboard chalk, notebooks, binders, folders, paper, index cards, glue, tape, rulers, scissors, staplers, staples, paper clips, printer ink, calculators, compasses, protractors, lunch boxes, school supply boxes, personal organizers, art supplies, clipboards, dry erase markers, sticky notes, bulletin board paper, educational posters and games and instructional materials with a sales price of fifty dollars ($50) or less per item.(ii) The department may promulgate regulations to include other similar items in the definitions of "art supplies," "instructional materials" and "school supplies" under this clause.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1596PN1908 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021